Maryland, session 2025, HB1494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
23–102.
This title applies only in Howard County.
23–1004.2.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS MT (MOVIE THEATER) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO THE OWNER OF A MOVIE
THEATER THAT HOLDS A CROWD CONTROL TRAINING CERTIFICATION.
– 1 –

Ch. 798 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR AT RETAIL
AT THE PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION BY A
PATRON WHO HAS PURCHASED A TICKET TO A CURRENT OR FUTURE SHOWING OF A
MOVIE ON THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(D) THE BOARD MAY SET:
(1) THE HOURS AND DAYS OF SALE FOR THE LICENSE; AND
(2) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(3) ANY OTHER LIMITATIONS ON AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
LICENSE THAT THE BOARD CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the holder of an alcoholic
beverages license for a movie theater in Howard County may renew the license only as a
Class MT (movie theater) beer, wine, and liquor license under § 23–1004.2 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –